District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.51

Establishment.

There is established within the District government the Management Supervisory Service to ensure that each agency has the highest quality managers and supervisors who are responsive to the needs of the government. Persons appointed to the Management Supervisory Service are not in the Career, Educational, Excepted, Executive, or Legal Service.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 951
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(k), 45 DCR 2464
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2(g), 46 DCR 1318

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-610.51.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Management Supervisory Service Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-70, October 25, 1999, law notification 47 DCR 2627).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(g) of the Legal Service Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-620, January 22, 1999, 46 DCR 1343).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Management Supervisory Service Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-153, October 22, 1999, 46 DCR 8866).

Construction of Law

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (Public Law 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.04(b)(3) is expressly superseded. Further, nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of § 47-391.01 et seq. or of § 164 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997 (Public Law 105-100; 111 Stat. 2160).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101(k) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of the act shall apply upon the enactment of legislation by the United States Congress that states the following: “Notwithstanding any other law, section 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Act of 1998, effective June 10, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-124; 45 DCR 2464) are enacted into law.” Section 134 of Title I of Division C of Pub. L. 105-277, 112 Stat. 2681-596, provided that “Notwithstanding any other law, sections 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Amendment Act of 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, effective June 11, 1998, are enacted into law.”